Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 7

Municipal Records

10-7-701. Public records — Temporary records.

All documents, papers, records, books of account, and minutes of the governing body of any municipal corporation, or of any office or department of any municipal corporation, within the definition of “permanent records,” “essential records,” and/or “records of archival value,” as defined in § 10-7-301, constitute “public records” of the municipal corporation. All documents, papers, or records of any municipal corporation or of any office or department of the municipal corporation that constitute “temporary records” and/or “working papers” within the definition set forth in § 10-7-301(13) and (14) constitute “public records” of the municipality, except that “temporary records” may be scheduled for disposal as authorized in this part.

Acts 1999, ch. 167, § 1.

10-7-702. Retention schedules.

The municipal technical advisory service, a unit of the Institute for Public Service of the University of Tennessee, is authorized to compile and print, in cooperation with the state library and archives, records retention manuals which shall be used as guides by municipal officials in establishing retention schedules for all records created by municipal governments in the state.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governing body of any municipality may by resolution authorize the disposal of any permanent paper record of the municipality when the record has been photocopied, photostated, filmed, microfilmed, preserved by microphotographic process, or reproduced onto computer or removable computer media, or any appropriate electronic medium, in accordance with § 10-7-121. Other records of the municipality may be disposed of when the retention period that is prescribed in the retention schedule used by the municipality has expired. For purposes of this subsection (b), disposal includes destruction of the record. A municipality may adopt reasonable rules and policies relative to the making, filing, storing, exhibiting, copying and disposal of municipal records.

Acts 1999, ch. 167, § 1; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; 2014, ch. 648, § 3.

10-7-112. Register to index transcript book or books.

10-7-118. Copies of such transcribed records — Admissibility as evidence.

10-7-123. Electronic access to county government information — Fees — Equal accessibility.

10-7-406. Original records photographed in duplicate before destruction — Stored for safekeeping — Accessible to public.

10-7-408. Appropriation of funds — Filing fees.